Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1307.07
Military medals; State Treasurer;
duties.

The
State Treasurer, upon receiving military medals, shall hold and maintain the
military medals for ten years or until the original owner or the owners' respective
heirs or beneficiaries can be identified and the military medals returned.
After ten years, the State Treasurer may designate a veteran's organization,
an awarding agency, or a governmental entity as the custodian of the military
medals. Once the military medals are turned over to a veteran's organization,
an awarding agency, or a governmental entity, the State Treasurer will no
longer be responsible for the safekeeping of the military medals.

Laws 2012, LB819, § 3.